New York, session 2025-2026, S3290.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 9-208 of the election law, as 2 added by section 1 of part JJ of chapter 55 of the laws of 2020, para- 3 graphs (d) and (e) as amended by chapter 474 of the laws of 2023, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 4. (a) The board of elections or a bipartisan committee appointed by 6 the board shall conduct a full manual recount of all ballots for a 7 particular contest: 8 i. Where the margin of victory is [twenty] ten votes or less; or 9 ii. Where the margin of victory is [0.5%] 0.25% or less; or 10 iii. In a contest where one million or more ballots have been cast and 11 the margin of victory is less than 5,000 votes. 12 (b) The board of elections or a bipartisan committee appointed by the 13 board shall conduct a full recount, manually or via the use of any auto- 14 mated tool authorized for such a use by the board of elections, which is 15 independent from the voting system it is being used to recount, of all 16 ballots for a particular contest where the margin of victory is less 17 than or equal to 0.5% but greater than 0.25%. 18 (c) For the purposes of this section, the term margin of victory shall 19 mean the margin between all votes cast in the entire contest following 20 the recanvass of votes. 21 [(c)] (d) Where the contest involves portions of two or more counties, 22 the margin of victory shall be determined by the state board of 23 elections based on the most recent recanvass results for the contest 24 submitted by the boards of elections of the counties involved. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00932-01-5 S. 3290 2 1 [(d)] (e) No board of elections shall commence a full manual recount 2 of a particular contest unless and until such board of elections has 3 completed and announced the results of the recanvass required by subdi- 4 vision one of this section, for each applicable election district. 5 [(e)] (f) The result of the manual recount of ballots shall supersede 6 the returns filed by the inspectors of election of the election district 7 in which the canvass was initially made. 8 (g) Any candidate who is deemed to be losing a contest by the margins 9 set forth in this subdivision shall, prior to any recount being 10 conducted, have the ability to reject a recount and concede victory of 11 such contest. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.